Missouri, session 2026, HB2204.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 105 and 130, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 105.990 and 130.200, to read as follows:
105.990. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri ethics commission, as established under section
105.955;
(2) "Public communication", any message distributed to the general public
through print, broadcast, digital, or outdoor media including, but not limited to,
newspapers, magazines, radio, television, internet, social media, billboards, mailers, or
printed handbills;
(3) "Sponsoring entity", any person, corporation, association, labor
organization, nonprofit, or political committee that pays for, produces, or authorizes
a public communication intended to influence public opinion or participation in any
political, social, or ideological cause.
2. Any sponsoring entity that pays for, produces, or authorizes a public
communication advocating a political, social, or ideological position, or promoting or
organizing protest activity, shall clearly and conspicuously include on or within such
communication a statement that reads: "Paid for by (name of sponsoring entity)",
followed by the entity’s city and state of business. For audio or video messages, the
statement shall be spoken or displayed at the beginning or end of the communication in
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2204 2
a clearly audible or visible manner. For online or digital materials, the statement shall
appear in a location readily viewable by the public without additional navigation or user
action.
3. This section shall not apply to:
(1) Personal or spontaneous social media posts made by private individuals
without payment for distribution;
(2) Genuine news coverage or editorial content not controlled by the sponsoring
entity; or
(3) Internal communications distributed solely to members or employees of an
organization.
4. The Missouri ethics commission shall administer and enforce this section.
Any person may file a complaint with the commission alleging a violation of this
section. The commission shall have authority to investigate such complaints, issue
subpoenas, compel production of records, and conduct hearings as provided under
sections 105.957 to 105.961.
5. Any sponsoring entity that fails to include the required disclaimer shall be
subject to the same civil penalties as campaign committees under section 130.072.
Knowingly concealing or misrepresenting the identity of the sponsoring entity shall
constitute a violation under this chapter and may be referred by the commission to the
attorney general or a prosecuting attorney for appropriate action.
6. The commission may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Restrict or condition the right of any person to assemble, speak, or protest
under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or Article I, Section 8 of
the Constitution of Missouri;
(2) Regulate personal, unpaid expression by individuals; or
(3) Authorize government review of content or viewpoint.
130.200. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:

HB 2204 3
(1) "Commission", the Missouri ethics commission, as established under section
105.955;
(2) "Compensated participation", any payment, gift, or thing of monetary value
provided to a person for the purpose of attending, supporting, promoting, or organizing
a protest activity;
(3) "Protest activity", any organized public demonstration, rally, march, or
assembly held in a public space for the purpose of expressing political, social, or
ideological views;
(4) "Sponsoring entity", any person, corporation, association, labor
organization, nonprofit, political committee, or other group that provides
compensation to one or more persons for participation in protest activity.
2. Any sponsoring entity that provides compensation to one or more persons for
participation in protest activity within this state shall file a report with the Missouri
ethics commission in the same manner and form as a report required of a campaign
committee or political action committee under sections 130.041 to 130.056. The report
shall include:
(1) The name and contact information of the sponsoring entity;
(2) The total amount expended for compensated participation;
(3) The approximate number of individuals compensated;
(4) The date and general location of the protest activity; and
(5) The name of any person or organization retained to organize, coordinate, or
manage the protest activity.
3. Reports shall be filed within seven days after the compensated protest activity
occurs or, if total expenditures exceed five thousand dollars, within forty-eight hours.
4. Reports shall be filed electronically in a form prescribed by the commission.
5. All reports filed under this section shall be treated as public records and made
available for inspection in the same manner as political expenditure reports under
section 130.050.
6. Any person may file a complaint with the commission alleging that a
sponsoring entity has violated this section. The commission shall have authority to
investigate such complaints, issue subpoenas, compel the production of records, and
conduct hearings as provided in section 105.957. If the commission finds probable cause
that a violation occurred, it shall proceed under section 105.961 and may assess a civil
penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars per day for each day the report remains
unfiled or inaccurate.

HB 2204 4
7. Knowingly concealing or misrepresenting the source of compensation shall
constitute a class A misdemeanor, and the commission may refer such cases to the
attorney general or appropriate prosecuting attorney.
8. All provisions of this chapter relating to reporting, auditing, enforcement,
penalties, and appeals applicable to campaign and political action committees shall also
apply to sponsoring entities under this section.
9. The commission may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
10. Any person who provides credible evidence leading to a confirmed violation
of this section shall be protected from retaliation as provided under section 105.965.
The identity of such person shall remain confidential unless disclosure is necessary for
enforcement.
11. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Restrict or condition the right of any person to assemble, speak, or protest
under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or Article I, Section 8 of
the Constitution of Missouri;
(2) Require any individual participant to display or communicate any
government-mandated message; or
(3) Authorize the regulation of protest activity based on content, viewpoint, or
the identity of participants.
✔